Nevada, session 83, AB246.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 209 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 1.1 and 1.3 of this act.
Sec. 1.1. 1. To the extent money is available for this
purpose, the Department shall establish vocational farm programs
in such institutions or facilities as the Director deems practical.
2. If a vocational farm program is established pursuant to
subsection 1:
(a) Participation in the program must be voluntary; and
(b) The program must:
(1) Comply with fair labor standards appropriate for
voluntary programs within correctional institutions;
(2) Implement sustainable agricultural practices suited to
the climate in this State; and
(3) Serve an educational and therapeutic purpose.
3. To the greatest extent practicable:
(a) Food produced through a vocational farm program
established pursuant to subsection 1 must be used in meals served
to offenders; and
(b) Any surplus of such food must be donated to charitable
organizations in the surrounding community.
Sec. 1.3. 1. The Department may contract for the services
of, or accept the volunteer services of, a registered dietitian who is
not employed by the Department and is not affiliated with a food
service vendor that has a contract with the Department.
2. The Department may adopt regulations concerning the
roles and responsibilities of a registered dietitian authorized to
provide services pursuant to subsection 1. Any such regulations
must be adopted in accordance with the provisions of chapter
233B of NRS.
3. As used in this section, “registered dietitian” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 640E.080.
-
*AB246_R1*

– 3 –
Sec. 1.5. NRS 233B.039 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233B.039 1. The following agencies are entirely exempted
from the requirements of this chapter:
(a) The Governor.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7 and NRS
209.221 and 209.2473, and section 1.3 of this act, the Department
of Corrections.
(c) The Nevada System of Higher Education.
(d) The Office of the Military.
(e) The Nevada Gaming Control Board.
(f) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 368A.140 and 463.765,
the Nevada Gaming Commission.
(g) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 425.620, the Division
of Welfare and Supportive Services of the Department of Health and
Human Services.
(h) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 422.390, the Division
of Health Care Financing and Policy of the Department of Health
and Human Services.
(i) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 533.365, the Office of
the State Engineer.
(j) The Division of Industrial Relations of the Department of
Business and Industry acting to enforce the provisions of NRS
618.375.
(k) The Administrator of the Division of Industrial Relations of
the Department of Business and Industry in establishing and
adjusting the schedule of fees and charges for accident benefits
pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 616C.260.
(l) The Board to Review Claims in adopting resolutions to carry
out its duties pursuant to NRS 445C.310.
(m) The Silver State Health Insurance Exchange.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5 and NRS
391.323, the Department of Education, the Board of the Public
Employees’ Benefits Program and the Commission on Professional
Standards in Education are subject to the provisions of this chapter
for the purpose of adopting regulations but not with respect to any
contested case.
3. The special provisions of:
(a) Chapter 612 of NRS for the adoption of an emergency
regulation or the distribution of regulations by and the judicial
review of decisions of the Employment Security Division of the
Department of Employment, Training and Rehabilitation;
(b) Chapters 616A to 617, inclusive, of NRS for the
determination of contested claims;
-
*AB246_R1*

– 4 –
(c) Chapter 91 of NRS for the judicial review of decisions of the
Administrator of the Securities Division of the Office of the
Secretary of State; and
(d) NRS 90.800 for the use of summary orders in contested
cases,
 prevail over the general provisions of this chapter.
4. The provisions of NRS 233B.122, 233B.124, 233B.125 and
233B.126 do not apply to the Department of Health and Human
Services in the adjudication of contested cases involving the
issuance of letters of approval for health facilities and agencies.
5. The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(a) Any order for immediate action, including, but not limited
to, quarantine and the treatment or cleansing of infected or infested
animals, objects or premises, made under the authority of the State
Board of Agriculture, the State Board of Health, or any other agency
of this State in the discharge of a responsibility for the preservation
of human or animal health or for insect or pest control;
(b) An extraordinary regulation of the State Board of Pharmacy
adopted pursuant to NRS 453.2184;
(c) A regulation adopted by the State Board of Education
pursuant to NRS 388.255 or 394.1694;
(d) The judicial review of decisions of the Public Utilities
Commission of Nevada;
(e) The adoption, amendment or repeal of policies by the
Rehabilitation Division of the Department of Employment, Training
and Rehabilitation pursuant to NRS 426.561 or 615.178;
(f) The adoption or amendment of a rule or regulation to be
included in the State Plan for Services for Victims of Crime by the
Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to
NRS 217.130;
(g) The adoption, amendment or repeal of rules governing the
conduct of contests and exhibitions of unarmed combat by the
Nevada Athletic Commission pursuant to NRS 467.075;
(h) The adoption, amendment or repeal of standards of content
and performance for courses of study in public schools by the
Council to Establish Academic Standards for Public Schools and the
State Board of Education pursuant to NRS 389.520;
(i) The adoption, amendment or repeal of the statewide plan to
allocate money from the Fund for a Resilient Nevada created by
NRS 433.732 established by the Department of Health and Human
Services pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 433.734;
or
(j) The adoption or amendment of a data request by the
Commissioner of Insurance pursuant to NRS 687B.404.
-
*AB246_R1*

– 5 –
6. The State Board of Parole Commissioners is subject to the
provisions of this chapter for the purpose of adopting regulations but
not with respect to any contested case.
7. The Department of Corrections is subject to the provisions
of this chapter for the purpose of adopting regulations relating to
fiscal policy, correspondence with inmates and visitation with
inmates of the Department of Corrections.
Sec. 1.7. 1. The Department of Corrections shall issue a
request for information during the 2025-2026 interim to gather data
on food service contracts that meet the annual needs of the
Department, for use in future contracting decisions.
2. A request for information issued pursuant to subsection 1
must:
(a) Be sent to at least two food service providers, at least one of
which must be a nonprofit organization; and
(b) Require the submission of:
(1) A proposal detailing the cost of providing food at the
current level of quality; and
(2) A proposal detailing the cost of providing food with
improved quality.
Sec. 1.9. 1. The Department of Corrections shall conduct a
comprehensive study to evaluate the food services in institutions and
facilities of the Department. The study must:
(a) Provide actionable insights to inform future policy decisions
on such food services; and
(b) Be completed within a 1-year period during the 2025-2026
interim.
2. In conducting the study required by subsection 1, the
Department shall:
(a) Use various data collection methods, including, without
limitation, surveys, interviews and focus groups, involving
Department staff and offenders; and
(b) Collect quantitative data to ensure any findings are
supported by a robust evidence base.
3. The study required by subsection 1 must include, without
limitation:
(a) A comprehensive cost analysis of the:
(1) Actual food service expenditures during the period in
which the study is conducted; and
(2) Projected costs for improving food quality, including any
anticipated increases in expenditures;
(b) A comparison of the nutritional value of current food service
offerings with a higher-quality alternative;
(c) An evaluation of food safety protocols and kitchen practices
in institutions or facilities of the Department;
-
*AB246_R1*

– 6 –
(d) Documentation of any deviations from the approved menu at
each institution or facility of the Department, including both the
originally planned menu items and the substitutions provided;
(e) An assessment of food waste across institutions and facilities
of the Department during the period in which the study is
conducted;
(f) A 90-day pilot program offering a “Pick Your Own Menu”
option, measuring food waste levels before, during and after the test
period;
(g) An evaluation of the impact of food services on the physical
and mental health of offenders, including any correlations between
dietary quality and overall well-being; and
(h) An analysis of the role of commissaries in complementing or
supplementing the Department’s meal offerings, including the
extent to which offenders rely on commissary items to meet
nutritional or caloric needs.
4. The Department shall post the results of the study required
by subsection 1 on the Internet website of the Department.
5. If the Department renews a contract with a food service
provider during the period of the study required by this section, the
term of the renewal must not exceed 2 years.
Sec. 2. The amendatory provisions of this act do not apply to a
contract entered into before October 1, 2025, but do apply to any
renewal or extension of such a contract.
H
-
*AB246_R1*